New York, session 2025-2026, S10640.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 704 of the laws of 1991 amending the 2 arts and cultural affairs law and chapter 912 of the laws of 1920 relat- 3 ing to the regulation of boxing and wrestling matches relating to tick- 4 ets to places of entertainment, as amended by chapter 155 of the laws of 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law, provided, chapter 61 of the laws of 2007 shall not 8 take effect with respect to the issuance of licenses or certificates 9 under this article by the secretary of state or department of state 10 until January 1, 2008 and regulation under this article by the commis- 11 sioners of licenses of the political subdivisions of the state shall 12 continue through December 31, 2007, and shall remain in full force and 13 effect only until and including June 30, [2026] 2027 when such act shall 14 be repealed and when, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 15 provisions of article 25 of title G of the arts and cultural affairs 16 law, repealed by such act, shall be reinstituted; provided further that 17 section 25.11 of the arts and cultural affairs law, as added by section 18 one of this act, shall survive such repeal date. Provided, however, the 19 printing on tickets required pursuant to sections 25.07 and 25.08 of 20 article 25 of the arts and cultural affairs law, as added by this act, 21 shall not apply to tickets printed prior to enactment of such article so 22 long as notice of the higher maximum premium price and prohibition of 23 sales within one thousand five hundred feet from the physical structure EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16038-01-6 S. 10640 2 1 of the place of entertainment, where applicable, is prominently 2 displayed at the point of sale and at such place of entertainment. 3 § 2. Section 11 of chapter 151 of the laws of 2010, amending the arts 4 and cultural affairs law relating to resale of tickets to places of 5 entertainment, as amended by chapter 155 of the laws of 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 § 11. Notwithstanding the provisions of article 5 of the general 8 construction law, if this act shall take effect after May 15, 2010, the 9 provisions of article 25 of the arts and cultural affairs law, except 10 section 25.11 are hereby revived and shall continue in full force and 11 effect as they existed on May 15, 2010 through June 30, [2026] 2027 when 12 upon such date such provisions shall expire and be deemed repealed. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.